Illinois, session 104th, HB2050.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Notary Public Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 312/1-101)  (from Ch. 102, par. 201-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Notary Public Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)